Utah statutes.
48-1-34 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Right to wind up.

Unless otherwise agreed, the partners who have not wrongfully dissolved the partnership or the legal representatives of the last surviving partner, not bankrupt, has the right to wind up the partnership affairs; provided, however, that any partner, his legal representatives or his assignee upon cause shown may obtain a winding up by the court.



No Change Since 1953 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

